Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 8
ELECTRONIC VOTING SYSTEMS

1-13.5-801. Use of electronic voting system.

An electronic voting system may be used in any local government election if the governing body authorizes its use.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 31, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-802. Sample ballots.

Sample ballots shall be printed and in the form of the official ballot but on paper of a different color from the official ballot. The designated election official shall provide that sample ballots for each polling place are delivered to the election judges and posted in the polling place on election day.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 31, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-803. Ballots - electronic voting.

Ballot pages or ballot cards placed upon voting devices shall be, so far as practicable, in the same order of arrangement as provided for paper ballots; except that the pages or cards shall be of the size and design required by the vote recorder or the electronic vote counting equipment, as applicable, and may be printed on a number of separate pages that are placed on the voting device or on one or more ballot cards.

If votes are recorded on a ballot card, a separate write-in ballot may be provided, which shall be in the form of a paper ballot on which the eligible elector may write in the titles of the office and the names of persons not on the printed ballot for whom he or she wishes to vote.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 31, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-804. Preparation for use - electronic voting.

Prior to an election in which an electronic voting system will be used, the designated election official shall:

Have the vote recorders or punching devices, or both, as applicable, prepared for voting; and

Inspect and determine that each recorder or device is in proper working order; and

Cause a sufficient number of such recorders or devices to be delivered to each polling place in which the electronic voting system is to be used.

The designated election official shall supply each polling place in which vote recorders or voting devices are to be used with a sufficient number of ballot cards, sample ballots, ballot boxes, write-in ballots, if required, and other supplies and forms as may be required. Each ballot card shall have a serially numbered stub attached, which the election judge shall remove before the card is deposited in the ballot box.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 31, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-805. Instructions to vote.

In case any eligible elector, after commencing to vote, asks for further instructions concerning the manner of voting, an election judge shall give such instructions to the elector; but no judge or other election officer or person assisting such elector shall request, suggest, or seek to persuade or induce any such elector to vote for any particular candidate or for or against any particular ballot issue or ballot question. After receiving such instructions, the elector shall vote as in the case of an unassisted voter.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 32, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-806. Ballots.

The designated election official shall provide sufficient ballots for every election in which an electronic voting system is used.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 32, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-807. Distribution of ballots - receipt - filing.

In a local government election in which an electronic voting system is used, the designated election official shall distribute to the election judges in the respective polling places a sufficient number of ballots. The ballots must be placed in one or more sealed packages for each polling place with marks on the outside of each stating clearly the polling place for which it is intended and the number of ballots enclosed. Such package shall be delivered to one of the election judges of such polling place no later than the day before the election. A receipt for the delivered ballots must be given by the election judge who received them. The receipt must be filed with the designated election official, who shall also keep a record of the time and manner in which each of said packages was sent and delivered.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 32, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-808. Instruction cards - posting - content.

The designated election official shall furnish to the election judges of each polling place a sufficient number of instruction cards to guide eligible electors in preparing their ballots. The election judges shall post at least one card in each polling place on the day of election. The cards shall be printed in large, clear type and contain full instructions to the elector as to what should be done:

To obtain a ballot for voting;

To prepare the ballot for deposit in the ballot box;

To obtain a new ballot in the place of one spoiled by accident or mistake; and

To obtain assistance in marking ballots.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 32, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-809. Close of polls - ballot return - transfer box - delivery.

After the polls close, the election judges shall secure the vote recorders or the voting devices, as applicable, against further use and prepare a ballot return in duplicate showing the number of voters as indicated by the pollbook who have voted in the polling place, the number of official ballot cards received, and the number of spoiled and unused ballot cards returned.

The original copy of the ballot return prepared pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be deposited in a durable transfer box along with all voted and spoiled ballots. The transfer box shall then be sealed in such a way as to prevent tampering with the box or its contents, using a numbered seal provided by the designated election official. One judge shall deliver the sealed transfer box to the counting center or other place identified by the designated election official.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 33, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-810. Testing of electronic ballot counting equipment.

The designated election official shall have the electronic ballot counting equipment tested pursuant to subsection (2) of this section to ascertain that it will accurately count the votes cast for all offices and all measures.

The electronic ballot counting equipment shall be tested at least three times, once on the day before the election, once just prior to the start of the count on election day, and finally at the conclusion of the counting. The designated election official may conduct any additional tests he or she deems necessary.

The designated election official shall vote and retain at least twenty-five test ballots, observe the tabulation of all test ballots by means of the electronic ballot counting equipment, and compare the tabulation with the previously retained records of the test vote count. The cause of any discrepancies shall be corrected prior to the actual vote tabulation.

All test materials, when not in use, must be kept in a secure location.

After the final conclusion of the counting, all programs, test materials, and ballots must be sealed and retained as provided for paper ballots.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 33, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-811. Electronic vote counting - procedure.

All proceedings at the counting center must be under the direction of the designated election official and must be conducted under the observation of watchers, so far as practicable; but no unauthorized person may touch any ballot or ballot card or return. If any ballot is damaged or defective so that it cannot properly be counted by the electronic vote counting equipment, a true duplicate copy shall be made of the damaged ballot in the presence of two election judges. The duplicate ballot must be substituted for the damaged ballot. All duplicate ballots shall be clearly labeled as such and shall bear a serial number, which is recorded on the damaged ballot.

When certified by the designated election official, the return printed by the electronic vote counting equipment, to which have been added write-in votes, constitutes the official return of each polling place. The designated election official may from time to time release unofficial returns. Upon completion of the count, the official returns are open to the public.

Absentee ballots must be counted at the counting center in the same manner as ballots voted at the polling place. Valid write-in votes may be counted at the polling place by the election judges or at the counting center.

If for any reason it becomes impracticable to count all or a part of the ballots with electronic vote counting equipment, the designated election official may direct that the ballots be counted manually, following as far as practicable the provisions governing the counting of paper ballots.

The receiving, opening, and preservation of the transfer boxes and their contents are the responsibilities of the designated election official, who shall provide adequate personnel and facilities to assure accurate and complete election results. Any indication of tampering with the ballots or ballot cards or other fraudulent action must be immediately reported to the district attorney, who shall immediately investigate the action and report his or her findings within ten days to the designated election official and, subject to prosecutorial discretion, shall prosecute to the full extent of the law any person responsible for the fraudulent action. The conduct of local government elections when electronic voting systems are used must follow, as nearly as practicable, the conduct of general and primary elections when such systems are used.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 34, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-812. Election laws pertaining to use of electronic voting systems - separate absentee ballots permitted.

A local government may use the provisions of part 6 of article 5 of this title not inconsistent with this article for elections conducted under this article in which electronic voting systems are used in polling places. Nothing in this article prohibits the use of a separate paper ballot by absentee voters.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 34, § 6, effective February 18.